Utah statutes.
4-11-14.   Maintenance of abandoned apiary, equipment, or appliance -- Nuisance.

(1)  It is a public nuisance to keep or maintain an abandoned apiary, apiary equipment, or appliance other than in an enclosure that prohibits the entry of bees.

(2)  Items listed in Subsection (1) are subject to seizure and destruction by the county bee inspector.

(3)  Upon discovery of, or receipt of a written complaint concerning, an abandoned apiary site, apiary equipment, or appliance, the county bee inspector shall attempt to notify the registered owner, if any.

(4) (a)  A registered owner notified under Subsection (3) shall remove the abandoned apiary, apiary equipment, or appliance or provide a bee-proof enclosure within 15 days.

(b)  The county bee inspector or the department shall verify the removal or protection in accordance with Subsection (4)(a) at the expiration of the 15-day period.

(c)  If a registered owner does not comply with Subsection (4)(a), the county bee inspector or the department may seize and destroy the abandoned apiary, apiary equipment, and appliances.

(5)  A county bee inspector or the department may seize and destroy an abandoned apiary, apiary equipment, or appliances if the abandoned apiary, apiary equipment, or appliances do not indicate a registered owner.

